Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-723
Transmission, telephone, and telegraph lines; violations; penalty.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of sections 75-709 to 75-724 shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. VII, § 23, p. 1428;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 206;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 474;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 133.